apertium-che.che.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Chechen

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
! Noun
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<cl_v%>  ! v.class
%<cl_j%>  ! j.class
%<cl_j2%> ! j.class II
%<cl_d%>  ! d.class
%<cl_b%>  ! b.class
%<cl_b2%> ! b.class II
%<cl_u%>  ! unknown class

! Number feature
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular


! Case
%<abs%> ! Absolutive
%<erg%> ! Ergative
%<gen%> ! Genitive
%<dat%> ! Dative
%<all%> ! Allative
%<ins%> ! Instrumental
%<lat%> ! Lative
%<cmp%> ! Comparative
%<ine%> ! Inessive
%<abl%> ! Ablative

! Proper Noun
%<np%>   ! Proper Noun
%<cog%>  ! Family name
%<ant%>  ! First name
%<hyd%>  ! Place name
%<al%>   ! Other proper nouns

! Pronoun
%<prn%>   ! Pronoun
%<pers%>   ! Personal
%<p1%>   ! 1st-person
%<p2%>   ! 2nd-person
%<p3%>   ! 3rd-person
%<inc%>   ! Inclusive
%<exc%>   ! Exclusive
%<ref%>   ! Reflective
%<dem%>   ! Demonstrative
%<prx%>   ! Proximal
%<dst%>   ! Distal
%<itg%>   ! Interrogative

! Verb
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<tv%>  ! Transitive
%<iv%>  ! Intransitive
%<cpl%> ! Copular
%<inf%> ! Infinite form
%<pres%> ! Present
%<past%> ! past
%<fut%>  ! Future
%<ptn%> ! Potential Future
%<imf%> ! Imperfective
%<pf%> ! Perfective
%<prog%> ! Progressive
%<rec%> ! Recent
%<rem%> ! Remote
%<imp%> ! Imperative
%<plt%> ! Polite Imperative
%<imd%> ! Immediate Imperative
%<tsk%> ! Tasked Imperative
%<ctg%> ! Categorical imperative
%<caus%> ! Causative
%<wit%> ! Witnessed
%<uwit%> ! Unwitnessed
%<dnm%> ! Verbal denominal
%<rcp%> ! Relative Clausal Participle
%<ptcp%> ! participle
%<neg%> ! Negation
%<cond%> ! Conditional
%<deic%> ! Deictic prefixes
%<prov%> ! Proverb

!Postposition
%<post%> ! Postposition

!Conjunction
%<conj%> !Conjunction

!Adjective
%<adj%> ! Adjective
%<cls%> ! Class Adjective
%<comp%> ! Comparative Adjective
%<ext%> ! Extended Comparative
%<sub%> ! Substantivized Adjective
%<idp%> ! Independent
%<dp%> ! Dependent

! Adverb
%<adv%> ! Adverb
%<tmp%> ! Time
%<loc%> ! Place
%<man%> ! Manner
%<rea%> ! Reason
%<quan%> ! Quantifying
%<des%> ! Descriptive

! Numeral
%<num%> ! Numeral
%<car%> ! Cardinal
%<ord%> ! Ordinal

%<unk%> ! Unknow

!Negative Particle
%<neg%> ! Negative

! wh-word
%<q%> ! Question word



! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%{a%}
%{i%}
%{i1%}
%{h%}
%{H%}
%{e%}
%{y%}
%{g%}
%{ee%}
%{г%}
%{x%}

%{b%}
%{b1%}
%{b2%}
%{b3%}
! %{b4%}
%{YY%}
%{A%}
%{A1%}
%{A2%}
%{E%}
%{EE%}
%{O%}
%{I%}
%{Y%}
! %{AA%}

! Punctuations
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

! Mathematic symbols
%<mat%>       ! Mathematic symbols

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
PropNounRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
Negation ;
Conjunction ;
Postposition ;
ProNoun ;
AdjRoot ;
Punctuation ;
Adv ;
Digits ;
LOOP ;
DIGITLEX ;



LEXICON NounVc !Absolutive forms aka. citation forms

%<n%>%<cl_v%>: RegNounUninfl ;

LEXICON NounJc

%<n%>%<cl_j%>: RegNounUninfl ;

LEXICON NounJ2c

%<n%>%<cl_j2%>: RegNounUninfl ;

LEXICON NounDc

%<n%>%<cl_d%>: RegNounUninfl ;

LEXICON NounBc

%<n%>%<cl_b%>: RegNounUninfl ;

LEXICON NounB2c

%<n%>%<cl_b2%>:  RegNounUninfl ;

LEXICON NounUc

%<n%>%<cl_u%>: RegNounUninfl ;


LEXICON NounDc-Aug-anim ! Augment base (different from abs forms)

%<n%>%<cl_d%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_d%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-anim;

LEXICON NounDc-Aug-inan ! Augment base (different from abs forms)

%<n%>%<cl_d%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_d%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-inan;

!LEXICON NounBc-Aug-anim

!%<n%>%<cl_b%>: RegNounInfl ;
!%<n%>%<cl_b%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-anim;

LEXICON NounBc-Aug-inan

%<n%>%<cl_b%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_b%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-inan;

LEXICON NounB2c-Aug-anim

%<n%>%<cl_b2%>:  RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_b2%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-anim;

LEXICON NounB2c-Aug-inan

%<n%>%<cl_b2%>:  RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_b2%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-inan;


LEXICON NounVc-Aug-anim

%<n%>%<cl_v%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_v%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-anim;

LEXICON NounVc-Aug-inan

%<n%>%<cl_v%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_v%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-inan;

LEXICON NounJc-Aug-anim

%<n%>%<cl_j%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_j%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-anim;

LEXICON NounJc-Aug-inan

%<n%>%<cl_j%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_j%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-inan;

LEXICON NounJ2c-Aug-anim

%<n%>%<cl_j2%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_j2%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-anim;

LEXICON NounJ2c-Aug-inan

%<n%>%<cl_j2%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_j2%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-inan;

LEXICON NounUc-Aug-anim

%<n%>%<cl_u%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_u%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-anim;

LEXICON NounUc-Aug-inan

%<n%>%<cl_u%>: RegNounInfl ;
%<n%>%<cl_u%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:  RegNounInfl-AbsPl-inan;





LEXICON RegNounUninfl
%<abs%>%<sg%>: # ;

LEXICON RegNounInfl

%<erg%>%<sg%>: RegNounInfl-Erg ;
%<erg%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}ша # ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}н # ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:и%{e%}н # ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}на # ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шана # ;
%<all%>%<sg%>: RegNounInfl-All ;
%<all%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шка # ;
%<ins%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}ца # ;
%<ins%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шца # ;
%<lat%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}х # ;
%<lat%>%<pl%>:%>%{YY%}х # ;
%<cmp%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}л # ;
%<cmp%>%<pl%>:%{YY%}л # ;
%<ine%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}хь # ;
%<ine%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шкахь # ;
%<abl%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}ра # ;
%<abl%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шкара # ;

LEXICON RegNounInfl-AbsPl-inan
:%>%{a%}ш # ;

LEXICON RegNounInfl-AbsPl-anim
:%>%{i%}й # ;

LEXICON RegNounInfl-Erg
:%>%{h%}о # ;

LEXICON RegNounInfl-All
:%>%{г%}%{A1%} # ;







LEXICON PropNounCog
%<np%>%<cog%>%<abs%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<abs%>%<pl%>:гӀар # ;

LEXICON PropNounAnt
%<np%>%<ant%>: PropNounInfl ;

LEXICON PropNounAl
%<np%>%<al%>: PropNounInfl ;

LEXICON PropNounHyd
%<np%>%<hyd%>: PropNounInfl ;

LEXICON PropNounInfl
%<abs%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<erg%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}с # ;
%<erg%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}ша # ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}н # ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:и%{e%}н # ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%>на # ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шана # ;
%<all%>%<sg%>: RegNounInfl-All ;
%<all%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шка # ;
%<ins%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}ца # ;
%<ins%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шца # ;
%<lat%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}х # ;
%<lat%>%<pl%>:%>%{YY%}х # ;
%<cmp%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}л # ;
%<cmp%>%<pl%>:%{YY%}л # ;
%<ine%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}хь # ;
%<ine%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шкахь # ;
%<abl%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}ра # ;
%<abl%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}шкара # ;




LEXICON Verb-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: VerbInfl ;

LEXICON Verb-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>: VerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>ийт VerbInfl ;

LEXICON VerbInfl
%<inf%>:%>а # ;
%<ptcp%>:%>ар RegNounInfl ;
%<pres%>:%>у # ;
%<prog%>%<ptcp%>:%>уш # ;
%<pres%>%<pf%>:%>%{i1%}%{H%}а # ;
%<past%>%<rec%>:%>и # ;
%<past%>%<rem%>:%>ира # ;
%<past%>%<imp%>:%>ура # ;
%<past%>%<pf%>%:%>%{i1%}нера # ;
%<fut%>%<ptn%>:%>ур # ;
%<dnm%>:%>ар RegNounInfl;
%<rcp%>%<pres%>:%>ун # ;
%<rcp%>%<past%>:%>%{i1%}%{H%}а # ;
%<imp%>:%>н # ;
%<plt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>нхьа # ;
%<plt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>нша # ;
%<imd%>:%>ал # ;
%<tsk%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>алахь # ;
%<tsk%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>алаш # ;
%<cat%>:%>ийла # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot
кӀант:кӀант NounVc ; ! "boy"
кӀант:кӀент NounVc-Aug-anim; ! "boys"
йоӀ:мехкар NounJc-Aug-anim ; ! "girls"
малх:малх NounBc ; ! "sun"
малх:мелх NounBc-Aug-inan ; ! "suns"
гала:гална NounDc-Aug-inan ; ! "noodle"
лом:лоьм NounDc-Aug-anim ; ! "lion"
хьаша:хьаша NounJ2c ; ! "guest"
хьаша:хьеш NounJ2c-Aug-anim ; ! "guest"
моз:моз NounDc ; ! "fly(noun)"
моз:моз NounDc-Aug-anim ; ! "fly(noun)"
ламаро:ламаро NounJ2c ; ! "mountainer"
ламаро:ламаро NounJ2c-Aug-anim ; ! "mountainer"
кол:кол NounJ2c ; ! "bush"
кол:коьл%{g%} NounJ2c-Aug-inan ; ! "bush"
ахгӀайре:ахгӀайре NounJ2c ; ! "peninsula"
ахгӀайре:ахгӀайре NounJ2c-Aug-inan ; ! "peninsula"
масса:масса NounJ2c ; ! "living creature"
масса:масс NounJ2c-Aug-anim ; ! "living creature"
тайпа:тайпан NounDc-Aug-inan ; ! "sort, kind"
бамба:бамба NounBc ; ! "cotton"
бамба:бамб NounBc-Aug-inan ; ! "cotton"
накъосталла:накъосталла NounDc ; ! "help, fellowship"
февраль:февраль NounB2c ; ! "February"
февраль:февраль NounB2c-Aug-inan ; ! "February"
актёр:актёр NounVc ; ! "actor"
актёр:актёр NounVc-Aug-inan ; ! "school"
бухӀа:бухӀа NounJc ; ! "owl"
хи:хи NounDc-Aug-inan ; ! "river, water"
йиш:эшар NounJc-Aug-inan ; ! "voice"
ваша:ваша NounVc ; ! "brother"
ваша:ваш NounVc-Aug-anim ; ! "brother"
базар:базар NounJc ; ! "bazaar, market"
котам:котам NounJc-Aug-anim ; ! "chicken"
алам:алам NounDc ; ! "phrase, expression"
шиъ:шиъ NounDc-Aug-inan ; ! "pair"
стигал:стигалх NounJc ; ! "top"
мотт:мотт NounB2c ; ! "language, tongue"
мотт:меттан NounB2c-Aug-inan ; ! "language, tongue"
диалект:диалект NounUc ; ! "dialect"
цициг:цициг NounDc-Aug-anim ; ! "cat"
чай:чай NounDc ; ! "tea"
да:да NounVc ; ! "father"
да:дех NounVc-Aug-anim ; ! "father"
ваша:ваша NounVc ; ! "brother"
ваша:ваша NounVc-Aug-anim ; ! "brother"
автовокзал:автовокзал NounVc ; ! "bus station"
автовокзал:автовокзал NounVc-Aug-inan ; ! "bus station"
маха:мех NounUc-Aug-anim ; ! "needle"
чӀара:чӀер NounUc-Aug-anim ; ! "fish"
белхало:белхало NounUc ; ! "labourer"
белхало:белхало NounUc-Aug-anim ; ! "labourer"
тур:тар%{g%} NounUc-Aug-inan ;
берана:берана NounDc-Aug-inan ; ! "advice"
батта:батта NounUc ; ! "month"
кехат:кехат NounDc ; ! "letter"
ресторан:ресторан NounUc-Aug-inan ; ! "restaurant"
къурд:къурд NounBc ; ! "sip"
къурд:къурд NounBc-Aug-inan ; ! "sip"
дечиг:дечиг NounBc-Aug-inan ; ! "wood"
нускал:нускал NounUc ; ! "bride"
нускал:нускал NounUc-Aug-anim ;
университет:университет NounJc-Aug-inan ;
бежана:бежана NounB2c ; ! "cattle"
бежана:бежан NounB2c-Aug-anim ;
етт:етт NounJc ; ! "cow"
етт:етт NounJc-Aug-anim ; ! "cow"
доттагӀ:доттагӀчуьн NounUc-Aug-anim ;
хена:хена NounUc-Aug-inan ; ! "air"
догӀ:догӀ NounUc ; ! "rain"
урама:урам NounUc-Aug-inan ; ! "street"
цӀено:цӀено NounDc-Aug-inan ; ! "house"
йиша:йиша NounJc-Aug-anim ; ! "sister"
чоь:чо NounUc-Aug-inan ; ! "room"
задания:заданий NounJc-Aug-inan ; ! "assignment"
цӀа:цӀа NounUc ; ! "home"
урок:урок NounJc ; ! "lesson"
къам:къам NounDc ; ! "tribe"
проект:проект NounJc-Aug-inan ; ! "project"
автобуса:автобуса NounJc ; ! "bus"
эвла:эвла NounJc-Aug-inan ;
Эвла:Эвла NounJc ; ! "village"
Климат:Климат NounUc-Aug-inan ; ! "climate"
континентал:континентал NounUc-Aug-inan ;
континент:континент NounUc ; ! "continent"
бутт:бутт NounB2c ; ! "month"
бутт:батт NounB2c-Aug-inan ; ! "month"
меттиг:меттиг NounJc-Aug-inan ; ! "place"
кӀеда:кӀеда NounB2c ; ! "tongue"
кӀеда:кӀеда NounB2c-Aug-inan ; ! "tongue"
кхоллам:кхоллам NounBc ; ! "marriage"
кхоллам:кхоллам NounBc-Aug-inan ; ! "marriage"
мангал:мангал NounBc ; ! "braid"
мангал:мангал NounBc-Aug-inan ; ! "braid"
хІоттам:хІоттам NounBc ; ! "weather??"
хІоттам:хІоттам NounBc-Aug-inan ;
кхин:кхин NounJ2c ; ! "daughter-like relative"
кхин:кхин NounJ2c-Aug-anim ; ! "daughter-like relative"
гуьйре:гуьйре NounJc ; ! "autumn"
къилбаседа:къилбаседа NounB2c ; ! "Polaris"
къилбаседа:къилбаседан NounB2c-Aug-inan ;
масса:масса NounJc-Aug-inan ;
дакъа:докъ NounDc-Aug-anim ;
орам:орам NounB2c ; ! "wordroot"
орам:орам NounB2c-Aug-inan ;
дитт:дитт NounDc ; ! "tree"
дитт:дитт NounDc-Aug-inan ;
стом:стом NounB2c ; ! "fruit"
стом:стоьм NounB2c-Aug-inan ;
хастом:хастом NounBc ; ! "vegetable"
хастом:хастоьм NounBc-Aug-inan ;
йовхо:йовхо NounJc ; ! "heat, fever"
мох:мех NounB2c-Aug-inan ;
малхбузе:малхбузе NounJc-Aug-inan ;
дохк:дохкар NounDc-Aug-inan ;
динамика:динамика NounUc ; ! "dynamics"
мур:мур NounDc ; ! "period"
стаг:стаг NounVc ; ! "person"
